Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.420

Report to legislature.

By February 1st of each year the department shall report to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate on the activities of the department under this chapter. The report shall include, at a minimum, a review of the department's enforcement activities, with the number of cases investigated and the number and amount of civil penalties assessed.

[ 1997 c 242 s 9; 1989 c 380 s 30.]